Utah statutes.
31A-27a-503.   Unauthorized postpetition transfers.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the receiver may avoid a
transfer of an interest of the insurer in property, or an obligation incurred
by the insurer, that is:
(a)  made or incurred after the day on which a petition for receivership is
filed; and
(b)  not authorized by the receiver and approved by the receivership court.
(2)  Except to the extent that a transfer or obligation voidable under this
section is otherwise voidable under this chapter, a transferee or obligee of a
transfer or obligation described in Subsection (1) has a lien on or may
retain, at the option of the receivership court, an interest transferred or
may enforce an obligation incurred, as the case may be:
(a)  if the transferee or obligee takes it for value and in good faith; and
(b)  to the extent that the transferee or obligee gave value to the insurer in
exchange for the transfer or obligation.
